Utah statutes.
31A-22-424.   Documents constituting entire life insurance policy.

(1)  A life insurance policy shall contain a provision that defines the documents and agreements that constitute the entire contract between the parties.

(2)  Except as permitted by Section 31A-21-106, all documents and agreements defined under Subsection (1) shall be attached to the policy.



Enacted by Chapter 116, 2001 General Session

